Montana, session 2025, HB41.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 50-32-232, MCA, is amended to read:
"50-32-232. Specific dangerous drugs included in Schedule V. Schedule V consists of the drugs
and other substances, by whatever official, common, usual, chemical, or brand name designated, listed in this
section.
(1) Narcotic drugs containing nonnarcotic active medicinal ingredients. Any compound, mixture, or
preparation containing any of the following is a narcotic drug, including its salts, calculated as the free
anhydrous base or alkaloid in limited quantities as set forth in subsections (1)(a) through (1)(f), which include
one or more nonnarcotic, active medicinal ingredients in sufficient proportion to confer upon the compound,
mixture, or preparation valuable medicinal qualities other than those possessed by narcotic drugs alone:
(a) not more than 200 milligrams of codeine per 100 milliliters or per 100 grams;
(b) not more than 100 milligrams of dihydrocodeine per 100 milliliters or per 100 grams;
(c) not more than 100 milligrams of ethylmorphine per 100 milliliters or per 100 grams;
(d) not more than 2.5 milligrams of diphenoxylate and not less than 25 micrograms of atropine
sulfate per dosage unit;
(e) not more than 100 milligrams of opium per 100 milliliters or per 100 grams; and
(f) not more than 0.5 milligram of difenoxin and not less than 25 micrograms of atropine sulfate
per dosage unit.
(2) Stimulants. Unless specifically exempted or excluded or unless listed in another schedule, any
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 41
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 41
material, compound, mixture, or preparation that contains any quantity of pyrovalerone is a stimulant having a
stimulant effect on the central nervous system, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers.
(3) Depressants. Unless specifically exempted or excluded or unless listed in another schedule,
any material, compound, mixture, or preparation that contains any quantity of the following substances is a
depressant having a depressant effect on the central nervous system, including its salts, isomers, and salts of
isomers:
(a) lacosamide, also known as (R)-2-acetoamido-N-benzyl-3-methoxy-propionamide or vimpat;
and
(b) pregabalin, also known as (S)-3-(aminomethyl)-5-methylhexanoic acid or lyrica; and
(c) gabapentin, also known as 1-(aminomethyl)cyclohexaneacetic acid.
(4) Anticonvulsant substances include the following:
(a) ezogabine;
(b) brivaracetam;
(c) cenobamate; and
(d) ganaxalone.
(5) Antimigraine substances including lasmiditan."
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 41
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 41, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 41
INTRODUCED BY C. SCHOMER
BY REQUEST OF THE DEPARTMENT OF JUSTICE
AN ACT REVISING THE LIST OF SPECIFIC DANGEROUS DRUGS INCLUDED IN SCHEDULE V; ADDING
GABAPENTIN TO THE DRUGS LISTED IN SCHEDULE V CONTROLLED SUBSTANCES; AND AMENDING
SECTION 50-32-232, MCA.”